North Carolina, session 2025, HB380.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 130A-155(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The school shall file an annual immunization report with the Department by
November 1. The child care facility shall file an immunization report annually with the
Department. The report shall be filed on forms prepared by the Department and shall state the
number of children attending the school or facility, the number of children who had not obtained
the required immunization within 30 days of their first attendance, the number of children who
received a medical exemption and the number of children who received a religious or
conscientious objection exemption."
SECTION 2. G.S. 130A-155.1(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Within 60 calendar days after the commencement of a new school year, the college
or university shall file an immunization report with the Department. The report shall be filed on
forms prepared by the Department and shall state the number of students attending the school or
facility, the number of students who had not obtained the required immunization within 30 days
of their first attendance, the number of students who received a medical exemption and the
number of students who received a religious or conscientious objection exemption."
SECTION 3. G.S. 130A-157 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-157. Religious or conscientious objection exemption.
If the bona fide religious beliefs of an adult or the parent, guardian or person in loco parentis
of a child has religious beliefs or reasons of conscience that are contrary to the immunization
requirements contained in prescribed by this Chapter, the adult or and the child shall be are
exempt from the these requirements. Upon submission of a written statement of the bona fide
religious beliefs or reasons of conscience and opposition to the immunization requirements, the
person may attend the college, university, school or facility without presenting a certificate of
immunization."
SECTION 4. G.S. 115C-76.25(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-76.25. Parent legal rights for their child's education.
(a) Parents have legal rights with regards to their child's education, including the
following:
…
*H380-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The right to seek a medical or religious medical, religious, or conscientious
objection exemption from immunization requirements, consistent with the
requirements of G.S. 130A-156 and G.S. 130A-157.
…."
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to public schools
beginning with the 2026-2027 school year and to colleges and universities located in this State
beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year.
Page 2 House Bill 380-First Edition